Delaware, session 153, SB81.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 1312, Title 14 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 1312. Experience. (g) In the case of a teacher or specialist with at least 4 years of full-time experience as a Title 1 or instructional paraprofessional in a public school who has been issued a permit by the Department of Education or an equivalent agency in another state prior to becoming a teacher or specialist, the teacher or specialist is given 1 year of experience credit on the salary schedule under Â§ 1305 of this title for every 2 years of full-time experience as such a paraprofessional in a public school. This subsection only applies to teachers hired after August 9, 2023.